Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3761
Commission; contracts authorized.

The commission may contract with the proper local, state, or national organizations, public or private, in carrying out the purposes of the Dry Bean Resources Act.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 27.